District of Columbia statutes.
18-710

International will information registration.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia shall establish a registry system by which authorized persons may register in a central information center, information regarding the execution of international wills, keeping that information in strictest confidence until the death of the maker and then making it available to any person desiring information about any will who presents a death certificate or other satisfactory evidence of the testator’s death to the center. Information that may be received, preserved in confidence until death, and reported as indicated is limited to the name, social security or any other individual-identifying number established by law, address, and date and place of birth of the testator, and the intended place of deposit or safekeeping of the instrument pending the death of the maker. The Mayor, at the request of the authorized person, may cause the information the Mayor receives about execution of any international will to be transmitted to the registry system of another jurisdiction, as identified by the testator, if that other system adheres to rules protecting the confidentiality of the information similar to those established in the District of Columbia.

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 102(b), 48 DCR 2087